California statutes. Corporations Code
If the ground for the complaint for involuntary dissolution of the corporation is a deadlock in the board as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 8510, the court may appoint a provisional director. The provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 7225 apply to any such provisional director so appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8513.

If, at the time of the filing of a complaint for involuntary dissolution or at any time thereafter, the court has reasonable grounds to believe that unless a receiver of the corporation is appointed the interests of the corporation or its members will suffer pending the hearing and determination of the complaint, upon the application of the plaintiff, and after a hearing upon such notice to the corporation as the court may direct and upon the giving of security pursuant to Sections 566 and 567 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the court may appoint a receiver to take over and manage the affairs of the corporation and to preserve its property pending the hearing and determination of the complaint for dissolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 190.)
-------------------------------------------

8514.

After hearing the court may decree a winding up and dissolution of the corporation if cause therefor is shown or, with or without winding up and dissolution, may make such orders and decrees and issue such injunctions in the case as justice and equity require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8515.

(a) Involuntary proceedings for winding up a corporation commence when the order for winding up is entered under Section 8514.

(b) When an involuntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the board shall conduct the winding up of the affairs of the corporation, subject to the supervision of the court, unless other persons are appointed by the court, on good cause shown, to conduct the winding up. The directors or such other persons may, subject to any restrictions imposed by the court, exercise all their powers through the executive officers without any order of court.

(c) When an involuntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the corporation shall cease to conduct its activities except to the extent necessary for the beneficial winding up thereof and except during such period as the board may deem necessary to preserve the corporation’s goodwill or going-concern value, pending a sale or other disposition of its assets, or both, in whole or in part. The directors shall cause written notice of the commencement of the proceeding for involuntary winding up to be given by mail to all members and to all known creditors and claimants whose addresses appear on the records of the corporation, unless the order for winding up has been stayed by appeal therefrom or otherwise or the proceeding or the execution of the order has been enjoined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8516.

When an involuntary proceeding for winding up has been commenced, the jurisdiction of the court includes:

(a) The requirement of the proof of all claims and demands against the corporation, whether due or not yet due, contingent, unliquidated or sounding only in damages, and the barring from participation of creditors and claimants failing to make and present claims and proof as required by any order.

(b) The determination or compromise of all claims of every nature against the corporation or any of its property, and the determination of the amount of money or assets required to be retained to pay or provide for the payment of claims. 

(c) The determination of the rights of members and of all classes of members in and to the assets of the corporation.

(d) The presentation and filing of intermediate and final accounts of the directors or other persons appointed to conduct the winding up and hearing thereon, the allowance, disallowance or settlement thereof and the discharge of the directors or such other persons from their duties and liabilities.

(e) The appointment of a commissioner to hear and determine any or all matters, with such power or authority as the court may deem proper.

(f) The filling of any vacancies on the board which the directors or the members are unable to fill.

(g) The removal of any director if it appears that the director has been guilty of dishonesty, misconduct, neglect or breach of trust in conducting the winding up or if the director is unable to act. The court may order an election to fill the vacancy so caused, and may enjoin, for such time as it considers proper, the reelection of the director so removed; or the court, in lieu of ordering an election, may appoint a director to fill the vacancy caused by such removal. Any director so appointed by the court shall serve until the next regular meeting of members or until a successor is elected or appointed.

(h) The staying of the prosecution of any suit, proceeding or action against the corporation and requiring the parties to present and prove their claims in the manner required of other creditors.

(i) The determination of whether adequate provision has been made for payment or satisfaction of all debts and liabilities not actually paid.

(j) The making of orders for the withdrawal or termination of proceedings, to wind up and dissolve, subject to conditions for the protection of members and creditors.

(k) The making of an order, upon the allowance or settlement of the final accounts of the directors or such other persons, that the corporation has been duly wound up and is dissolved. Upon the making of such order, the corporate existence shall cease except for purposes of further winding up if needed.

(l) The making of orders for the bringing in of new parties as the court deems proper for the determination of all questions and matters.

(m) The disposition of assets held in charitable trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8517.

(a) All creditors and claimants may be barred from participation in any distribution of the general assets if they fail to make and present claims and proofs within such time as the court may direct, which shall not be less than four nor more than six months after the first publication of notice to creditors unless it appears by affidavit that there are no claims, in which case the time limit may be three months. If it is shown that a claimant did not receive notice because of absence from the state or other cause, the court may allow a claim to be filed or presented at any time before distribution is completed.

(b) Such notice to creditors shall be published not less than once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the proceeding is pending or, if there is no such newspaper published in that county, in such newspaper as may be designated by the court, directing creditors and claimants to make and present claims and proofs to the person, at the place and within the time specified in the notice. A copy of the notice shall be mailed to each person shown as a creditor or claimant on the books of the corporation, at such person’s last known address.

(c) Holders of secured claims may prove for the whole debt in order to realize any deficiency. If such creditors fail to present their claims they shall be barred only as to any right to claim against the general assets for any deficiency in the amount realized on their security.

(d) Before any distribution is made the amount of any unmatured, contingent or disputed claim against the corporation which has been presented and has not been disallowed, or such part of any such claim as the holder would be entitled to if the claim were due, established or absolute, shall be paid into court and there remain to be paid over to the party when the party becomes entitled thereto or, if the party fails to establish a claim, to be paid over or distributed with the other assets of the corporation to those entitled thereto; or such other provision for the full payment of such claim, if and when established, shall be made as the court may deem adequate. A creditor whose claim has been allowed but is not yet due shall be entitled to its present value upon distribution.

(e) Suits against the corporation on claims which have been rejected shall be commenced within 30 days after written notice of rejection thereof is given to the claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8518.

(a) Upon the final settlement of the accounts of the directors or other persons appointed pursuant to Section 8515 and the determination that the corporation’s affairs are in condition for it to be dissolved, the court may make an order declaring the corporation duly wound up and dissolved. The order shall declare:

(1) That the corporation has been duly wound up, that a final franchise tax return, as described by Section 23332 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, has been filed with the Franchise Tax Board, as required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and that its known debts and liabilities have been paid or adequately provided for, or that those debts and liabilities have been paid as far as its assets permitted, as the case may be. If there are known debts or liabilities for payment of which adequate provision has been made, the order shall state what provision has been made, setting forth the name and address of the corporation, person or governmental agency that has assumed or guaranteed the payment, or the name and address of the depositary with which deposit has been made or such other information as may be necessary to enable the creditor or other person to whom payment is to be made to appear and claim payment of the debt or liability.

(2) That its known assets have been distributed to the persons entitled thereto or that it acquired no known assets, as the case may be.

(3) That the accounts of directors or such other persons have been settled and that they are discharged from their duties and liabilities to creditors and members.

(4) That the corporation is dissolved.

(b) The court may make such additional orders and grant such further relief as it deems proper upon the evidence submitted.

(c) Upon the making of the order declaring the corporation dissolved, corporate existence shall cease except for the purposes of further winding up if needed; and the directors or such other persons shall be discharged from their duties and liabilities, except in respect to completion of the winding up.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 26.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8519.

Whenever a corporation is dissolved or its existence forfeited by order, decree or judgment of a court, a copy of the order, decree or judgment, certified by the clerk of court, shall forthwith be filed. The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the dissolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 27.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Voluntary Dissolution [8610. - 8618.]

8610.

(a) Any corporation may elect voluntarily to wind up and dissolve (1) by approval of a majority of all members (Section 5033), or (2) by approval of the board and approval of the members (Section 5034).

(b) Any corporation which comes within one of the following descriptions may elect by approval of the board to wind up and dissolve:

(1) A corporation which has been the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy.

(2) A corporation which has disposed of all of its assets and has not conducted any activity for a period of five years immediately preceding the adoption of the resolution electing to dissolve the corporation.

(3) A corporation which has no members.

(4) A corporation which is required to dissolve under provisions of its articles adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 7132.

(c) If a corporation comes within one of the descriptions in subdivision (b) and if the number of directors
 then in office is less than a quorum, it may elect to voluntarily wind up and dissolve by any of the following:

(1) The unanimous consent of the directors then in office.

(2) The affirmative vote of a majority of the directors then in office at a meeting held pursuant to waiver of notice by those directors complying with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7211.

(3) The vote of a sole remaining director.

(d) If a corporation elects to voluntarily wind up and dissolve pursuant to subdivision (c), references to the board in this chapter and Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 8710) shall be deemed to be to a board consisting solely of those directors or that sole director and action by the board shall require at least the same consent or vote as
 would be required under subdivision (c) for an election to wind up and dissolve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 25.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

8610.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, when a corporation has not issued any memberships, a majority of the directors, or, if no directors have been named in the articles or have been elected, the incorporator or a majority of the incorporators, may sign and verify a certificate of dissolution stating the following:

(1) That the certificate of dissolution is being filed within 24 months from the date the articles of incorporation were filed.

(2) That the corporation does not have any debts or other liabilities, except as provided in paragraph (3) and subdivision (d).

(3) That the tax liability will be satisfied on a taxes-paid basis, or that a person or corporation or other business entity assumes the tax liability, if any, of the dissolving corporation and is responsible for additional corporate taxes, if any, that are assessed and that become due after the date of the assumption of the tax liability.

(4) That a final franchise tax return, as described by Section 23332 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, has been or will be filed with the Franchise Tax Board as required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(5) That the corporation was created in error.

(6) That the known assets of the corporation remaining after payment
 of, or adequately providing for, known debts and liabilities have been distributed as required by law or that the corporation acquired no known assets, as the case may be.

(7) That a majority of the directors, or, if no directors have been named in the articles or have been elected, the incorporator or a majority of the incorporators authorized the dissolution and elected to dissolve the corporation.

(8) That the corporation has not issued any memberships, and if the corporation has received payments for memberships, those payments have been returned to those making the payments.

(9) That the corporation is dissolved.

(b) A certificate of dissolution signed and
 verified pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board and the Attorney General’s Registry of Charities and Fundraisers of the dissolution.

(c) Upon filing a certificate of dissolution pursuant to subdivision (b), a corporation shall be dissolved and its powers, rights, and privileges shall cease.

(d) Notwithstanding the administrative dissolution of a corporation pursuant to this section, its liability to creditors, if any, is not discharged. The liability of the directors of, or other persons related to, the administratively dissolved corporation is not discharged. The dissolution of a corporation pursuant to this section shall not diminish or adversely affect the ability of the Attorney General
 to enforce liabilities as otherwise provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 478, Sec. 20.   (AB 1756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8611.

(a) Whenever a corporation has elected to wind up and dissolve a certificate evidencing that election shall forthwith be filed. A copy of that certificate shall be filed with the Attorney General if the corporation holds assets in charitable trust or has a charitable dissolution clause.

(b) The certificate shall be an officers’ certificate or shall be signed and verified by at least a majority of the directors then in office or by one or more members authorized to do so by approval of a majority of all members (Section 5033) and shall set forth:

(1) That the corporation has elected to wind up and dissolve.

(2) If the election was made by the vote of members alone, the number of votes for the election and that the election was made by a majority of all members (Section 5033).

(3) If the election was made by the board and the members pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 8610, the certificate shall state that it was made by the board and the members in accordance with Section 5034.

(4) If the certificate is executed by a member or members, that the subscribing person or persons were authorized to execute the certificate a majority of all members (Section 5033).

(5) If the election was made by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8610, the circumstances showing the corporation to be within one of the categories described in that
 subdivision.

(c) If an election to dissolve made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8610 is made by the vote of all the members of a corporation with members or by a vote of all members of the board of a corporation without members pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8610 and a statement to that effect is added to the certificate of dissolution pursuant to Section 8615, the separate filing of the certificate of election pursuant to this section is not required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 16.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8612.

(a) A voluntary election to wind up and dissolve may be revoked prior to distribution of any assets: (1) if the election was made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8610, by the vote of members representing a majority of the voting power; or (2) if the election was by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8610, by approval of the board. Thereupon a certificate evidencing the revocation shall be signed, verified and filed in the manner prescribed by Section 8611 and a copy thereof filed with the Attorney General.

(b) The certificate shall set forth:

(1) That the corporation has revoked its election to wind up and dissolve.

(2) That no assets have been distributed pursuant to the election.

(3) If the revocation was made by the vote of members alone, the number of votes for the revocation and that the revocation was made by persons representing at least a majority of the voting power.

(4) If the revocation was made by the board alone, the certificate shall so state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8613.

(a) Voluntary proceedings for winding up the corporation commence upon the adoption of the resolution required by Section 8610 by the members, by the board and members, or by the board alone, electing to wind up and dissolve.

(b) When a voluntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the board shall continue to act as a board and shall have full powers to wind up and settle its affairs, both before and after the filing of the certificate of dissolution.

(c) When a voluntary proceeding for winding up has commenced, the corporation shall cease to conduct its activities except to the extent necessary for the beneficial winding up thereof, to the extent necessary to carry out its purposes, and except during such period as the board may deem necessary to preserve the corporation’s goodwill or going-concern value pending a sale or other disposition of its assets, or both, in whole or in part. The board shall cause written notice of the commencement of the proceeding for voluntary winding up to be given by mail to all its members (except no notice need be given to the members who voted in favor of winding up and dissolving the corporation), to all known creditors and claimants whose addresses appear on the records of the corporation, and in the case of a corporation holding assets in charitable trust to the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 812, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

8614.

If a corporation is in the process of voluntary winding up, the superior court of the proper county, upon the petition of (a) the corporation, or (b) the authorized number (Section 5036), or (c) in the case of a corporation holding assets in charitable trust, the Attorney General, or (d) three or more creditors, and upon such notice to the corporation and to other persons interested in the corporation as members and creditors as the court may order, may take jurisdiction over such voluntary winding up proceeding if that appears necessary for the protection of any parties in interest or in the case of a corporation holding assets in charitable trust, for the protection of such assets. The court, if it assumes jurisdiction, may make such orders as to any and all matters concerning the winding up of the affairs of the corporation and the protection of its members, creditors and in the case of a corporation holding assets in charitable trust, for the protection of such assets, as justice and equity may require. The provisions of Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8510) (except Sections 8510 and 8511) shall apply to such court proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8615.

(a) When a corporation has been completely wound up without court proceedings therefor, a majority of the directors then in office shall sign and verify a certificate of dissolution stating:

(1) That the corporation has been completely wound up.

(2) That its known debts and liabilities have been actually paid, or adequately provided for, or paid or adequately provided for as far as its assets permitted, or that it has incurred no known debts or liabilities, as the case may be. If there are known debts or liabilities for payment of which adequate provision has been made, the certificate shall state what provision has been
 made, setting forth the name and address of the corporation, person or governmental agency that has assumed or guaranteed the payment, or the name and address of the depositary with which deposit has been made or such other information as may be necessary to enable the creditor or other person to whom payment is to be made to appear and claim payment of the debt or liability.

(3) That its known assets have been distributed to the persons entitled thereto or that it acquired no known assets, as the case may be.

(4) That the corporation is dissolved.

(5) That all final returns required under the Revenue and Taxation Code, have been or will be filed with the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) The certificate of dissolution shall be filed and thereupon the corporate
 existence shall cease, except for the purpose of further winding up if needed. The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the dissolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 21.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8616.

Except as otherwise provided by law, if the term of existence for which any corporation was organized expires without renewal or extension thereof, the board shall terminate its activities and wind up its affairs; and when the affairs of the corporation have been wound up a majority of the directors shall execute and file a certificate conforming to the requirements of Section 8615.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8617.

(a) The board, in lieu of filing the certificate of dissolution, may petition the superior court of the proper county for an order declaring the corporation duly wound up and dissolved. Such petition shall be filed in the name of the corporation.

(b) Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall make an order requiring all interested persons, including the Attorney General in the case of a corporation holding assets in charitable trust, to show cause why an order shall not be made declaring the corporation duly wound up and dissolved and shall direct that the order be served by notice to all creditors, claimants, and members in the same manner as the notice given under subdivision (b) of Section 8517.

(c) Any person claiming to be interested as member, creditor or otherwise may appear in the proceeding at any time before the expiration of 30 days from the completion of publication of the order to show cause and contest the petition, and upon failure to appear such person’s claim shall be barred.

(d) Thereafter an order shall be entered and filed and have the effect as prescribed in Sections 8518 and 8519.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

8618.

(a) A corporation in the process of voluntary winding up may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

(b) The written notice to known creditors and claimants required by subdivision (c) of Section 8613 shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Describe any information that must be included in a claim.

(2) Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent.

(3) State the deadline, which may not be fewer than 120 days from the effective date of the written notice, by which the corporation must receive the claim.

(4) State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

(c) A claim against the corporation is barred if any of the following occur:

(1) A claimant who has been given the written notice under subdivision (b) does not deliver the claim to the corporation by the deadline.

(2) A claimant whose claim was rejected by the corporation does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within 90 days from the effective date of the rejection notice.

(d) For purposes of this section “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 589, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. General Provisions Relating to Dissolution [8710. - 8724.]

8710.

The powers and duties of the directors (or other persons appointed by the court pursuant to Section 8515) and officers after commencement of a dissolution proceeding include, but are not limited to, the following acts in the name and on behalf of the corporation:

(a) To elect officers and to employ agents and attorneys to liquidate or wind up its affairs.

(b) To continue the conduct of the affairs of the corporation insofar as necessary for the disposal or winding up thereof.

(c) To carry out contracts and collect, pay, compromise and settle debts and claims for or against the corporation.

(d) To defend suits brought against the corporation.

(e) To sue, in the name of the corporation, for all sums due or owing to the corporation or to recover any of its property.

(f) To collect any amounts remaining unpaid on memberships or to recover unlawful distributions.

(g) To sell at public or private sale, exchange, convey or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation for an amount deemed reasonable by the board without compliance with the provisions of Section 7911 and to execute bills of sale and deeds of conveyance in the name of the corporation.

(h) In general, to make contracts and to do any and all things in the name of the corporation which may be proper or convenient for the purposes of winding up, settling and liquidating the affairs of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

8711.

A vacancy on the board may be filled during a winding up proceeding in the manner provided in Section 7224.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8712.

When the identity of the directors or their right to hold office is in doubt, or if they are dead or unable to act, or they fail or refuse to act or their whereabouts cannot be ascertained, any interested person, including the Attorney General in the case of corporations holding assets in charitable trust, may petition the superior court of the proper county to determine the identity of the directors or, if there are no directors, to appoint directors to wind up the affairs of the corporation, after hearing upon such notice to such persons as the court may direct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8713.

(a) After determining that all the known debts and liabilities of a corporation in the process of winding up have been paid or adequately provided for, the board shall distribute all the remaining corporate assets in the manner provided in Sections 8715 to 8717, inclusive.

(b) If the winding up is by court proceeding or subject to court supervision, the distribution shall not be made until after the expiration of any period for the presentation of claims that has been prescribed by order of the court.

(c) Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, assets, if any, which are not subject to attachment, execution or sale for the corporation’s debts and liabilities may be distributed pursuant to Sections 8715 to 8717, inclusive, even though all debts and liabilities have not been paid or adequately provided for.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8714.

The payment of a debt or liability, whether the whereabouts of the creditor is known or unknown, has been adequately provided for if the payment has been provided for by either of the following means:

(a) Payment thereof has been assumed or guaranteed in good faith by one or more financially responsible persons or by the United States government or any agency thereof, and the provision (including the financial responsibility of such persons) was determined in good faith and with reasonable care by the board to be adequate at the time of any distribution of the assets by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The amount of the debt or liability has been deposited as provided in Section 8720.

This section does not prescribe the exclusive means of making adequate provision for debts and liabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

8715.

After complying with the provisions of Section 8713, assets held by a corporation upon a valid condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance, which condition has occurred or will occur, shall be returned, transferred, or conveyed in accordance with the condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8716.

After complying with the provisions of Section 8713:

(a) Except as provided in Section 8715 those assets held by a corporation in a charitable trust shall be disposed of on dissolution in conformity with its articles or bylaws subject to complying with the provisions of any trust under which such assets are held.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the disposition required in subdivision (a) shall be made by decree of the superior court of the proper county in proceedings to which the Attorney General is a party. The decree shall be made upon petition therefor by the Attorney General or, upon 30 days’ notice to the Attorney General, by any person concerned in the dissolution.

(c) The disposition required in subdivision (a) may be made without the decree of the superior court, subject to the rights of persons concerned in the dissolution, if the Attorney General makes a written waiver of objections to the disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8717.

After complying with the provisions of Section 8713 and except as otherwise provided in Sections 8715 and 8716, assets held by a corporation shall be disposed of on dissolution as follows:

(a) If the articles or bylaws provide the manner of disposition, the assets shall be disposed of in that manner.

(b) If the articles or bylaws do not provide the manner of disposition, the assets shall be distributed among the members in accordance with their respective rights therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8718.

Subject to the provisions of any trust under which assets to be distributed are held, distribution may be made either in money or in property or securities and either in installments from time to time or as a whole, if this can be done fairly and ratably and in conformity with the provisions of the articles and bylaws and shall be made as soon as reasonably consistent with the beneficial liquidation of the corporation assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8719.

(a) If a corporation in process of winding up has more than one class of memberships outstanding, a plan of distribution of the memberships, obligations or securities of any other corporation, domestic or foreign, or assets other than money which is not in accordance with the liquidation rights of any class or classes as specified in the articles or bylaws may nevertheless be adopted if approved by (1) the board and (2) by approval by the members (Section 5034) of each class. The plan may provide that such distribution is in complete or partial satisfaction of the rights of any of such members upon distribution and liquidation of the assets.

(b) A plan of distribution so approved shall be binding upon all the members. The board shall cause notice of the adoption of the plan to be given by mail within 20 days after its adoption to all holders of memberships having a liquidation preference.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

8720.

(a) If any members, creditors, or other persons are unknown or fail or refuse to accept their payment or distribution in cash or property or their whereabouts cannot be ascertained after diligent inquiry, or the existence or amount of a claim of a creditor, member or other person is contingent, contested, or not determined, or if the ownership of any memberships is in dispute, the corporation may deposit any such payment, distribution, or the maximum amount of the claim with the Controller in trust for the benefit of those lawfully entitled to the payment, distribution, or the amount of the claim. The payment or distribution shall be paid over by the depositary to the lawful owners, their representatives or assigns, upon satisfactory proof of title.

(b) For the purpose of providing for the transmittal, receipt, accounting for, claiming, management, and investment of all money or other property deposited with the Controller under subdivision (a), the money or other property shall be deemed to be paid or delivered for deposit with the Controller under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and may be recovered in the manner prescribed in that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 860, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8721.

(a) Whenever in the process of winding up a corporation any distribution of assets has been made, otherwise than under an order of court, without prior payment or adequate provision for payment of any of the debts and liabilities of the corporation, any amount so improperly distributed to any person may be recovered by the corporation. Any of such persons may be joined as defendants in the same action or be brought in on the motion of any other defendant.

(b) Suit may be brought in the name of the corporation to enforce the liability under subdivision (a) against any or all persons receiving the distribution by any one or more creditors of the corporation, whether or not they have reduced their claims to judgment.

(c) Members who satisfy any liability under this section shall have the right of ratable contribution from other distributees similarly liable. Any member who has been compelled to return to the corporation more than the member’s ratable share of the amount needed to pay the debts and liabilities of the corporation may require that the corporation recover from any or all of the other distributees such proportion of the amounts received by them upon the improper distribution as to give contribution to those held liable under this section and make the distribution of the assets fair and ratable, according to the respective rights and preferences of the memberships, after payment or adequate provision for payment of all the debts and liabilities of the corporation.

(d) As used in this section, “process of winding up” includes proceedings under Chapters 15 (commencing with Section 8510) and 16 (commencing with Section 8610) and also any other distribution of assets to persons made in contemplation of termination or abandonment of the corporate business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

8722.

(a) A corporation which is dissolved nevertheless continues to exist for the purpose of winding up its affairs, prosecuting and defending actions by or against it and enabling it to collect and discharge obligations, dispose of and convey its property and collect and divide its assets, but not for the purpose of continuing its activities except so far as necessary for the winding up thereof.

(b) No action or proceeding to which a corporation is a party abates by the dissolution of the corporation or by reason of proceedings for winding up and dissolution thereof.

(c) Any assets inadvertently or otherwise omitted from the winding up continue in the dissolved corporation for the benefit of the persons entitled thereto upon dissolution of the corporation and on realization shall be distributed accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

8723.

(a) (1) Causes of action against a dissolved corporation, whether arising before or after the dissolution of the corporation, may be enforced against any of the following:

(A) Against the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its undistributed assets, including, without limitation, any insurance assets held by the corporation that may be available to satisfy claims.

(B) If any of the assets of the dissolved corporation have been distributed to other persons, against those persons to the extent of their pro rata share of the claim or to the extent of the corporate assets distributed to them upon dissolution of the corporation, whichever is
 less.

The total liability of a person under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets of the dissolved corporation distributed to that person upon dissolution of the corporation.

(2) Except as set forth in subdivision (c), all causes of action against a person to whom assets were distributed arising under this section are extinguished unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the cause of action against that person prior to the earlier of the following:
